Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 20. Chiropractors.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the 1988 amendments to this chapter, see sec. 1, ch. 60, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For board of chiropractic examiners, see 12 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers, § 37.

70 C.J.S., Physicians and Surgeons, §§ 11-57.

Liability of chiropractors for medical malpractice, 77 A.L.R.4th 273.